Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-923
Department; determine ability to pay for services; uniform fee schedule; reduced or waived; when.

The department shall determine the ability of the spouses or individuals to pay for services but shall not charge more than the actual cost. The department shall prepare and adopt a uniform fee schedule to be used. The scheduled fees may be reduced or waived by authorization of the department according to the rules of the department and as may be considered necessary to further the objective of the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act. The use of facilities and services established by the act shall not be denied residents of Nebraska because of inability to pay scheduled fees. Any fees received under this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 23;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 8.